Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 3.
Unlawful Marriages Generally.

Research References.

- Friend's Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 28 Domestic Actions.
§
28.02 Marriage. Friend.

Harrison on Wills & Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 2 Dower and Curtesy.
§
2.09 Marriage. Cox.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 3A M.J. Bigamy,
§§
2, 3; 9B M.J. Incest,

§

2; 12B M.J. Marriage,

§§

4, 6.

§ 20-38.

Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 644.

Cross references.

- For present provisions covering the subject matter of the repealed section, see
§
20-38.1.

§ 20-38.1. Certain marriages prohibited.

The following marriages are prohibited:

A marriage entered into prior to the dissolution of an earlier marriage of one of the parties;

A marriage between an ancestor and descendant, or between siblings, whether the relationship is by the half or the whole blood or by adoption;

A marriage between an uncle or aunt and a nephew or niece, whether the relationship is by the half or the whole blood.

(1975, c. 644; 1978, c. 647; 2020, c. 900.)

Cross references.

- For provision that the issue of marriages prohibited by law shall nevertheless be legitimate, see
§
20-31.1.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 900 deleted the subdivision (a) designation; redesignated subdivisions (a) (1) through (a) (3) as subdivisions 1 through 3; in subdivision 2, substituted "siblings" for "a brother and a sister"; in subdivision 3, substituted "or aunt and a nephew or niece" for "and a niece or between an aunt and a nephew" and deleted "(b) [Repealed.]."

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For article, "Marriage and the State: The Withering Away of Marriage," see 62 Va. L. Rev. 663 (1976).

§ 20-39. Prohibition continues notwithstanding dissolution of previous marriage.

In the cases mentioned in § 20-38.1, in which the relationship is founded on a marriage, the prohibition shall continue in force, notwithstanding the dissolution of such marriage by death or by divorce, unless the divorce be for a cause which made the marriage originally unlawful or void.

(Code 1919, § 5086; 1976, c. 356.)

§ 20-40. Punishment for violation of such prohibition; leaving Commonwealth to avoid.

If any person marry in violation of § 20-38.1, he shall be confined in jail not exceeding six months, or fined not exceeding $500, in the discretion of the jury. If any persons, resident in the Commonwealth and within the degrees of relationship mentioned in that section, shall go out of the Commonwealth for the purpose of being married, and with the intention of returning, and be married out of it, and afterwards return to and reside in it, cohabiting as a married couple, they shall be punished as provided in this section, and the marriage shall be governed by the same law as if it had been solemnized in the Commonwealth. The fact of such cohabitation here shall be evidence of such marriage. Venue for a violation of this section may be in the county or city where the subsequent marriage occurred or where the parties to the subsequent marriage cohabited.

(Code 1919, §§ 4540, 5089; 1976, c. 356; 2003, c. 99; 2020, c. 900.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 2003, c. 99, cl. 2, provides: "That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§
30-19.1:4, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and is $0 for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice."

The 2003 amendments.

- The 2003 amendment by c. 99 added the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 900 substituted "the Commonwealth" for "this Commonwealth" wherever it appears and "a married couple" for "man and wife" in the second sentence.

§§ 20-41, 20-42.

Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 589.

Cross references.

- For provisions covering the subject matter of the repealed sections, see
§§
18.2-362, 18.2-364.

§ 20-43. Bigamous marriages void without decree.

All marriages that are prohibited by law on account of either of the parties having a former spouse then living shall be absolutely void, without any decree of divorce or other legal process.

(Code 1919, § 5087; 2020, c. 900.)

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 900 substituted "that" for "which" and "spouse" for "wife or husband."

Law review.

- For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

§ 20-44.

Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 589.

Cross references.

- For provisions covering the subject matter of the repealed section, see
§
18.2-363.

§ 20-45.

Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 644.

Cross references.

- For present provisions as to void and voidable marriages, see
§
20-45.1.

§ 20-45.1. Void and voidable marriages.

All marriages that are prohibited by § 20-38.1 are void.

All marriages solemnized when either of the parties lacked capacity to consent to the marriage at the time the marriage was solemnized, because of mental incapacity or infirmity, shall be void from the time they shall be so declared by a decree of divorce or nullity.

All marriages solemnized on or after July 1, 2016, when either or both of the parties were, at the time of the solemnization, under the age of 18 and have not been emancipated as required by § 20-48 shall be void from the time they shall be so declared by a decree of divorce or nullity. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this section shall not apply to a lawful marriage entered in another state or country prior to the parties being domiciled in the Commonwealth.

(1975, c. 644; 2016, cc. 457, 543.)

The 2016 amendments.

- The 2016 amendments by cc. 457 and 543 are identical, and substituted subsection A and B designations for "(a)" and "(b)"; rewrote subsection A, which read "All marriages which are prohibited by
§
20-38.1 or where either or both of the parties are, at the time of the solemnization of the marriage, under the age of eighteen, and have not complied with the provisions of

§

20-48 or

§

20-49, are void"; and added subsection C.

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

For note, "State Regulations Are Failing Our Children: An Analysis of Child Marriage Laws in the United States," see 60 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2337 (2019).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 3A M.J. Bigamy,
§
2; 12B M.J. Marriage,

§§

4, 6, 7, 14; 12B M.J. Marriage Contracts and Settlements,

§

5.

§§ 20-45.2, 20-45.3.

Repealed by Acts 2020, cc. 75 and 195, cl. 1, and c. 900, cl. 2.

Editor's note.

- Repeals the statutory prohibitions on same-sex marriages and civil unions or other arrangements between persons of the same sex purporting to bestow the privileges and obligations of marriage. These prohibitions are no longer valid due to the United States Supreme Court decision in Obergefell v. Hodges, 576 U.S. 644, 135 S. Ct. 2584, 192 L. Ed. 2d 609 (June 26, 2015).

Former
§
20-45.2, pertaining to marriage between persons of same sex, derived from 1975, c. 644; 1997, cc. 354, 365.

Former
§
20-45.3, pertaining to civil unions between persons of same sex, derived from Acts 2004, c. 983.

§§ 20-46, 20-47.

Repealed by Acts 1985, c. 421.

Editor's note.

- Repealed
§
20-46 was amended by Acts 1984, c. 703.

§ 20-48. Minimum age of marriage.

The minimum age at which persons may marry shall be 18, unless a minor has been emancipated by court order. Upon application for a marriage license, an emancipated minor shall provide a certified copy of the order of emancipation.

(Code 1919, § 5090; 1932, p. 529; 1942, p. 230; 1946, p. 500; 1960, c. 363; 1972, c. 823; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1975, c. 644; 1989, c. 733; 2008, cc. 174, 206; 2016, cc. 457, 543.)

Cross references.

- As to void marriages, see
§
20-45.1.

The 2008 amendments.

- The 2008 amendments by cc. 174 and 206 are identical and deleted the former last paragraph, relating to clerks issuing marriage licenses or preventing marriages.

The 2016 amendments.

- The 2016 amendments by cc. 457 and 543 are identical, and rewrote the first paragraph, which read "The minimum age at which persons may marry, with consent of the parent or guardian, shall be sixteen" and deleted the second paragraph pertaining to consent for marriage of a minor in the case of pregnancy.

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1971-1972, see 58 Va. L. Rev. 1257 (1972). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975).

For note, "Exploring the Boundaries of Obergefell," see 58 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2063 (2017).

For note, "State Regulations Are Failing Our Children: An Analysis of Child Marriage Laws in the United States," see 60 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 2337 (2019).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 12B M.J. Marriage,
§§
4, 7.

§ 20-49.

Repealed by Acts 2016, cc. 457 and 543, cl. 2.